Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.100

Findings.

The legislature of this state finds that the retail distribution and sales of equipment, utilizing independent dealers operating under agreements with suppliers, vitally affects the general economy of the state, public interests, and public welfare and that it is necessary to regulate the business relations between the dealers and the suppliers.

[ 2002 c 236 s 6; 1990 c 124 s 1.]